Mississippi statutes. Title 55. Parks and Recreation
Confederate Monumental Park

§ 55-15-41.
Metes and bounds.

The following described portion of the old capitol grounds is dedicated and appropriated for the purpose of establishing a confederate monumental park, and protecting and preserving the confederate monument now erected, and any that may be hereafter erected thereon. Beginning at the southwest corner of the present capitol grounds, at junction of Pearl and State Streets, thence running north along the east side of State Street two hundred and thirty-four feet; thence east at a right angle to said State Street, three hundred feet; thence south parallel with State Street, two hundred and thirty-four feet to Pearl Street; thence along north side of Pearl Street to point of beginning.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 3297; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5733; 1930, § 5563; 1942, § 6020; Laws, 1902, ch. 76.

§ 55-15-43.
Transfer of duties and responsibilities of Confederate Monumental Park Commission; construction of references in laws.

The Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall be the Confederate Monumental Park Commission, and shall exercise the duties and responsibilities of the Confederate Monumental Park Commission.

The words “Confederate Monumental Park Commission,” wherever they may appear in the laws of the State of Mississippi, shall be construed to mean the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 3298; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5734; 1930, § 5564; 1942, § 6021; Laws, 1978, ch. 484, § 47; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 123, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).